North Carolina, session 2025, HB184.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(1) Dimension lumber. – Lumber that has not been grade-stamped under the
authority of a lumber grading bureau.
(2) Small mill. – A sawmill that mills less than 1,000,000 board feet of lumber
per year.
SECTION 1.(b) The North Carolina Residential Code Council shall amend the
North Carolina Residential Code in order to permit dimension lumber that has not been
grade-stamped under the authority of a lumber grading bureau to be used in the construction of
one- and two-family dwellings, when that use meets all of the following requirements:
(1) The lumber is sold directly by the owner or employee of the sawmill that
milled the lumber to the owner of the dwelling to be constructed or that
person's authorized representative.
(2) The dimension lumber meets or exceeds the requirements of the North
Carolina Residential Code other than the requirements that only
grade-stamped lumber be used in residential construction.
(3) The operator of the sawmill has a certificate from a state-approved lumber
grading training program, certifies that the lumber conforms with product and
inspection standards under American Softwood Lumber Standard PS20, and
marks the lumber with (i) the mill number, name, or abbreviation, (ii) the
species or combination of species of the lumber, (iii) whether the lumber was
dry or green when manufactured as required by American Softwood Lumber
Standard PS20, and (iv) whether the lumber conforms with PS20 standards.
(4) The appropriate code enforcement official reviews the framing of the dwelling
to ensure that it meets the requirements of the North Carolina Residential
Code in all respects other than the requirements that only grade-stamped
lumber be used in residential construction. The code enforcement official shall
not be liable for any structural failure that occurs as a result of the use of
dimension lumber rather than grade-stamped lumber.
*H184-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The sawmill provides to the purchaser a certificate containing all of the
following information:
a. A statement of the species of wood, quantity milled, and address where
the lumber will be used.
b. The name of the sawmill operator certified pursuant to G.S. 143-138.2
who milled the lumber.
c. A certification that the lumber meets or exceeds the requirements of
the North Carolina Residential Code with the exception that it has not
been grade-stamped by an accredited lumber grading bureau.
d. The date of sale of the lumber.
SECTION 1.(c) The North Carolina Residential Code Council shall amend the North
Carolina Residential Code and the North Carolina Building Code Council shall amend the North
Carolina Building Code in order to permit dimension lumber that has not been grade-stamped
under the authority of a lumber grading bureau to be used in the construction of one- and
two-family dwellings and structures classified as Residential Group R-2 or R-3, when that use
meets all of the following requirements:
(1) The lumber is sold directly by the owner or employee of a small mill or a
mobile sawmill that milled the lumber to the owner of the structure to be
constructed or that person's authorized representative.
(2) The dimension lumber meets or exceeds the requirements of the North
Carolina Residential Code or the North Carolina Building Code, as applicable,
other than the requirements that only grade-stamped lumber be used in
residential construction.
(3) The operator of the small mill or mobile sawmill has a certificate from a
state-approved lumber grading training program, certifies that the lumber
conforms with product and inspection standards under American Softwood
Lumber Standard PS20, and marks the lumber with (i) the mill number, name,
or abbreviation, (ii) the species or combination of species of the lumber, (iii)
whether the lumber was dry or green when manufactured as required by
American Softwood Lumber Standard PS20, and (iv) whether the lumber
conforms with PS20 standards.
(4) The appropriate code enforcement official reviews the framing of the structure
to ensure that it meets the requirements of the North Carolina Residential
Code or the North Carolina Building Code, as applicable, in all respects other
than the requirements that only grade-stamped lumber be used in residential
construction. The code enforcement official shall not be liable for any
structural failure that occurs as a result of the use of dimension lumber rather
than grade-stamped lumber.
(5) The small mill or mobile sawmill provides to the purchaser a certificate
containing all of the following:
a. A statement of the species of wood, quantity milled, and address where
the lumber will be used.
b. The name of the sawmill operator certified pursuant to G.S. 143-138.2
who milled the lumber.
c. A certification that the lumber meets or exceeds the requirements of
the North Carolina State Building Code with the exception that it has
not been grade-stamped by an accredited lumber grading bureau.
d. The date of sale of the lumber.
SECTION 1.(d) The Residential Code Council and Building Code Council shall
adopt temporary rules to implement the requirements of this section no later than 180 days after
Page 2 House Bill 184-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the effective date of this section. The Residential Code Council and Building Code Council shall
also adopt permanent rules to replace the temporary rules.
SECTION 2.(a) Article 9 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143-138.2. Lumber grading training program.
(a) The North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service shall establish a basic lumber
grading training program for individuals and establish the general requirements for successfully
completing the training program, including requirements for initial certification and for
recertification. The North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service shall offer the training
program at least annually. The Extension Forestry staff, in cooperation with the staff of the North
Carolina Forest Service, shall develop and establish the content of the training program,
determine the certification requirements for instructors teaching the training program, and
determine the criteria for determining successful completion of the training program. Instructors
shall be approved by the North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service.
(b) The North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service may, in its discretion, authorize
one or more private lumber grading training programs, provided that the content of the private
programs and certification requirements for instructors and criteria for successful completion of
the training program are at least as stringent as the program offered by the North Carolina
Cooperative Extension Service. An authorized private training program may issue initial
certifications and recertifications.
(c) An individual holding an initial certification from the program established by
subsection (a) of this section, from a private program authorized under subsection (b) of this
section, or from a state-approved lumber grading program in another state who mills lumber in
the State shall be recertified under the training program every five years.
(d) An individual who holds an initial certification from the program established by
subsection (a) of this section, from a private program authorized under subsection (b) of this
section, or from a state-approved lumber grading program in another state shall register with the
North Carolina Forest Service before selling lumber that has not been grade-stamped under the
authority of a lumber grading bureau directly to the owner of a structure for use in construction
of the structure."
SECTION 2.(b) The North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service shall establish
the basic lumber grading training program no later than 180 days after the effective date of this
section.
SECTION 3. G.S. 160D-1110 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b1) For a structure constructed with lumber that has not been grade-stamped under the
authority of a lumber grading bureau, a building permit applicant shall submit with the building
permit application all of the following:
(1) A statement of the species of wood, quantity, and address where the lumber
will be used.
(2) The name of the sawmill operator certified pursuant to G.S. 143-138.2 who
milled the lumber.
(3) A certification that the lumber meets or exceeds the requirements of the North
Carolina State Building Code with the exception that it has not been
grade-stamped by an accredited lumber grading bureau.
(4) The date of sale of the lumber."
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this act is effective when it becomes law and expires when
the Residential Code Council and Building Code Council have issued permanent rules
substantially similar to Sections 1(b) and 1(c) of this act and notifies the Codifier of Statutes that
it has done so. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on the date that the temporary rules required
to be adopted by the Residential Code Council and Building Code Council by Section 1 of this
act become effective. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 184-First Edition Page 3